Mississippi, session 2026, SB2306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-17-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-17-5.  (1)  It shall be the purpose of the Commission on School Accreditation to continually review the standards on accreditation and the enforcement thereof and to make recommendations thereon to the State Board of Education.  All controversies involving the accreditation of schools shall be initially heard by a duly authorized representative of the commission before whom a complete record shall be made.  After the conclusion of the hearing, the duly authorized representative of the commission shall make a recommendation to the commission as to the resolution of the controversies, and the commission, after considering the transcribed record and the recommendation of its representative, shall make its decision which becomes final unless the local school board of the school district involved shall appeal to the State Board of Education, which appeal shall be on the record previously made before the commission's representative except as may be provided by rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education.  Such rules and regulations may provide for the submission of new factual evidence.  All appeals from the State Board of Education shall be on the record and shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  The commission shall select a competent and qualified court reporter to record and transcribe all hearings held before its duly authorized representative whose fees and costs of transcription shall be paid by the school district involved within forty-five (45) days after having been notified of such costs and fees by the commission.  An appropriate member of the staff of the State Department of Education shall be designated by the State Superintendent of Public Education to serve as executive secretary of the commission. (2)  The State Board of Education by and through the Commission on School Accreditation shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the professional conduct and governance of school board members and establish penalties for violations of such rules.  If a member of a school board is cited by the Department of Education for such violations, the State Department of Education shall be authorized to direct the school board to reduce or remove the compensation for the school board member in accordance with the rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education. (3)  A subcommittee of the Commission on School Accreditation shall be established to assist the State Department of Education in reviewing and responding to infractions and violations regarding the professional conduct and governance of school board members. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.